en: carrot juice powder
it: succo di carota in polvere
pl: sok z marchwi w proszku

en: salsify, black salsify
ar: سلسفي هسباني
az: İspan təkəsaqqalı
be: Скарцанера
bg: испански кокеш, черен корен, козелец
ca: Escurçonera de nap
cs: hadí mord španělský
da: Skorzonerrod
de: Schwarzwurzeln
et: mustjuur, aed-mustjuur
eu: Eskortzonera
fi: Mustajuuri
fr: salsifis, salsifis noirs
gl: Escorzoneira
hr: crni korijen
hu: Feketegyökér
it: scorzonera
ja: スコルツォネラヒスパニカ
ku: Sping
lt: Valgomoji gelteklė
lv: melnsakne
nl: schorseneren
pl: Wężymord czarny korzeń
pt: Escorcioneira
ro: Scorțoneră
ru: Козелец испанский
sv: Svartrot
tr: Sakız otu
zh: 黑婆罗门参

en: salsify juice concentrate
hr: koncentriani sok crnog korijena, ugośćeni sok crnog korijena
it: concentrato di succo di scorzonera

en: vegetable oyster
la: Tragopogon porrifolius

en: celeriac
ar: الكرفس اللفتي
bg: корен целина
ca: Api-rave
cs: celer bulvový
da: knoldselleri
de: Knollensellerie
eo: tubercelerio
es: Apio nabo, raiz de apio
et: Juurseller
fi: mukulaselleri, juuriselleri
fr: céleri-rave, céleri rave
ga: Soiliriac
hr: korijen celera
it: sedano rapa
ja: セロリアック
la: Apium graveolens var. rapaceum
ms: Akar saderi
nb: sellerirot
nl: knolselderij
pl: seler korzeń, korzeń selera, seler korzeniowy
ro: rădăcină de țelină
ru: корень сельдерея
sr: koren celera
sv: Rotselleri

en: taro tuber
fr: Tubercule de taro
it: tubero di taro

en: sweet potato
af: Patats
ak: atomo
am: ስኳር ድንች
ar: بطاطا حلوة
ay: Apichu
az: Qramafonçiçək batat
be: Батат
bg: сладък картоф, сладки картофи
bn: মিষ্টি আলু
bo: ཞོག་མངར།
br: patatez dous
bs: Batat
ca: moniato, muniato
cs: povijnice batátová
da: sød kartoffel
de: Süßkartoffel, Süsskartoffeln, Süßkartoffeln
el: Γλυκοπατάτα
eo: Batato
es: patata dulce, batata, boniato
et: bataat
eu: Batata
fa: سیب‌زمینی شیرین
fi: bataatti
fj: Kumala
fr: patate douce, patates douces
ga: Práta Spáinneach
gn: Jety
gu: શક્કરીયાં
he: בטטה
hi: शकरकन्द
hr: batat, krumpir batat, slatki krumpir
ht: Patat
hu: Édesburgonya
hy: բաթաթ
id: Ubi jalar
io: Patato
is: Sætar kartöflur
it: Patata dolce, patate dolci
ja: サツマイモ, さつまいも, さつま芋, 薩摩芋, 甘藷
jv: Ketéla rambat
ka: ბატატი
kk: Батат
km: ដំឡូងជ្វា
kn: ಸಿಹಿ ಗೆಣಸು
ko: 고구마
ky: Батат
la: Ipomoea batatas
lg: Lumonde awusse
ln: Libɛngɛ́
lo: ມັນດ້າງ
lt: Batatas
lv: batāte, Saldie kartupeļi
mk: Сладок компир
ml: മധുരക്കിഴങ്ങ്
mr: रताळे
ms: ubi keledek
nb: søtpotet
ne: सखरखण्ड
nl: zoete aardappel
nn: søtpotet
or: କନ୍ଦମୂଳ
pa: ਸ਼ਕਰਕੰਦ
pl: batat, batata, batatów, słodki ziemniak, słodkich ziemniaków, słodkie ziemniaki, słodkiego ziemniaka, batatowy, bataty
pt: batata-doce
qu: Kumar
ro: Batat
ru: батат
sa: मिष्टालुकम्
sd: ناڙو
sh: Batat
si: බතල
sk: Povojník batatový
sl: Batata, Sladki krompir
sn: Mbambaira
so: Sonkor qadi
sq: patatja e ëmbël
sr: Батат
su: Hui
sv: sötpotatis
sw: Kiazi kitamu
ta: வற்றாளை
te: చిలగడదుంప
tg: Батат
th: มันเทศ
tl: Kamote
to: Kumala
tr: Tatlı patates
ug: تاتلىقياڭيۇ
uk: Батат
ur: شکر قندی
uz: Batat
vi: Khoai lang
wo: pataas
yi: זיס־קארטאפל
za: Maenz
zh: 番薯

en: Cooked sweet potato
it: patata dolce cotta

en: Sweet potato puree cooked with cream
it: purea di patate dolci cotta con panna

en: organic sweet potato
hr: bio krumpirslatki
it: patata dolce biologica

en: purple sweet potato
it: patata dolce viola
ja: ムラサキイモ, 紫芋, 紫いも, むらさきいも, 有色甘藷

en: cassava, cassava root, manioc, manioc root, yuca, yuca root
af: broodwortel
ak: bankyi
ar: بفرة
az: maniok
be: маніёк
bg: маниока
bi: maniok
bm: banaku
bn: শিমুল আলু
ca: iuca
cs: maniok jedlý
da: kassava, cassava, maniok
de: Maniok, Cassave
ee: agbeli
el: κασάβα
eo: manioko
es: cassava
eu: manioka
fa: مانیوک
fi: maniokki, kassava
fr: manioc, racine de manioc
ga: casabhach
gl: mandioca
gn: mandi'o
gu: મોગો
ha: rogo
he: מניהוט מצוי
hr: manioka
ht: manyòk dous
hu: manióka
id: singkong
io: manioko
is: kassavarót
it: manioca
ja: キャッサバ
jv: ketéla pohung
kg: mandioko
ki: mĩanga
kn: ಮರಗೆಣಸು
ko: 카사바
la: manihot esculenta, mandioca
ln: manyɔ́kɔ
lt: valgomasis manijokas
lv: manioka
mg: mangahazo
ml: മരച്ചീനി
ms: ubi kayu
my: ပီလောပီနံ
nb: maniok
nl: maniok, cassave
nn: kassava, maniokrot
ny: chinangwa
oc: manioc
pl: kassawa
pt: mandioca
qu: rumu
ru: маниок
sg: gozo
sh: manioka
sl: manioka
sn: mufarinya
sr: tapioka, тапиока
su: sampeu
sv: maniok
sw: muhogo
ta: மரவள்ளி
te: కర్ర పెండలము
th: มันสำปะหลัง
tl: kamoteng-kahoy
to: mānioke
tr: manyok
ty: māniota
uk: маніок
ur: کاساوا
vi: sắn
yi: מאניאק
yo: ẹ̀gẹ́
za: moegsawz
zh: 木薯

en: cassava flour
bg: брашно от маниока
de: Maniokmehl
fr: farine de manioc
hr: brašno od kasave
hu: maniókaliszt
it: farina di manioca
nl: maniokmeel
nn: kassavamel
pl: mąka z manioku
sv: maniokmjöl

en: tapioca, tapioca starch, manioc starch
ar: تابيوكا
bg: тапиока, нишесте от тапиока
ca: tapioca, midó de tapioca, midó de mandioca
cs: tapioka, tapiokový škrob
da: tapioca, tapiokastivelse, tapiocastivelse
de: Tapioka, Tapiocastärke, Tapiokastärke, Maniokstärke
el: ταπιόκα, άμυλο ταπιόκαζ
eo: tapioko
es: tapioca, almidón de tapioca, almidón de mandioca
eu: tapioka
fa: تاپیوکا
fi: tapioka, tapiokatärkkelys
fr: tapioca, amidon de tapioca, amidon de manioc
ga: taipióca
he: טפיוקה
hr: tapioka
hu: tápióka, tápiókakeményítő
id: tapioka
io: tapiokao
it: tapioca, amido di tapioca
ja: タピオカ
jv: tapioka
kk: тапиока, tapïoka, تاپىيوكا
ko: 타피오카
mt: tapjoka
nb: tapioka, tapiokastivelse
nl: tapiocazetmeel, tapioca zetmeel, tapioca
nn: tapioka
pl: tapioka, skrobia z tapioki, skrobia tapiokowa, skrobia z manioku
pt: tapioca
ru: тапиока
sk: tapiokový škrob
sl: tapioka, tapiokin škrob
su: tapioka
sv: tapioka, tapiokastärkelse, stärkelse från kassavaroten
uk: тапіока
vi: bột năng
zh: 木薯根淀粉

en: modified tapioca starch, modified manioc starch
da: modificeret tapiokastivelse
de: modifizierte Tapiokastärke
es: almidón modificado de tapioca, almidón modificado de mandioca
fi: muunnettu tapiokatärkkelys
fr: amidon modifié de tapioca, amidon transformé de tapioca, amidon de tapioca modifié, amidon modifié de manioc
hr: modificirani škrob tapioke
hu: módosított tápiókakeményítő
it: amido modificato di tapioca
nb: modifisert tapiokastivelse
nl: gemodificeerd tapiocazetmeel
pl: Skrobia modyfikowana z tapioki
pt: amido modificado de tapioca
sv: modifierad tapiokastärkelse, modifierad tapioka stärkelse

en: tapioca flour
bg: брашно от тапиока
da: Tapiocamel
de: Tapiokamehl
es: Harina de tapioca
fi: tapiokajauho
fr: farine de tapioca, fécule de tapioca, fécule de manioc
hr: tapioka brašno
hu: tápiókaliszt
it: Farina di tapioca
nl: tapiocameel
nn: tapiokamel
pl: mąka tapiokowa
pt: Farinha de tapioca
sv: tapiokamjöl

en: tigernut
ca: xufa, xufas
de: Tigernuss, Erdmandel
es: chufa, xufa, chufas, xufas
fr: souchet, souchet comestible, noix tigrée, souchet sucré, souchet tubéreux
hr: tigrasti orah
it: zigolo dolce

en: tigernut milk
ca: orxata de chufa, orxata de xufa
de: Erdmandelmilch
es: horchata de chufa
fr: lait de souchet, orgeat de souchet, lait de noix tigrée
hr: tigrovo mlijeko
it: latte di chufa

en: yam
de: Yam, Yamswurzel, Yamswurzeln
fr: igname
hr: jam
it: yam

en: chinese yam, Japanese mountain yam, satsuma imo, yamaimo, onagaimo, hawaii mountain yam
ar: ديسقوريا متعددة السنيبلات
fa: یم چینی
hr: kineski jam
ja: ナガイモ, 長芋, 山芋
ko: 마
la: Dioscorea polystachya
lt: Batatinė dioskorėja
lv: Ķīnas jamss
ms: Ubi cina
pl: Pochrzyn chiński
ru: Диоскорея многокистевая
th: ฮ่วยซัว
uk: Китайський ямс
za: Maenzbya
zh: 山药, 薯蕷